District of Columbia statutes.
47-2515

Effective date.

The provisions of this chapter (relating to repeal of the gross earnings tax applicable to financial institutions) will be effective for financial institutions beginning with the federal taxable year following the 3-year transition period described in § 47-2507. All other provisions of this chapter shall take effect on September 13, 1980.

History

Sept. 13, 1980, D.C. Law 3-95, § 501, 27 DCR 3509
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2515.